Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-947.01
University of Nebraska at Kearney; programs authorized.

The University of Nebraska at Kearney may maintain the baccalaureate general academic, baccalaureate occupational, and baccalaureate professional degree programs which Kearney State College maintained prior to July 1, 1991. Subject to approval by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, the University of Nebraska at Kearney may award the master's degree in business administration. Subject to approval by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, the University of Nebraska at Kearney may offer other master's degree programs upon demonstration of a compelling need in disciplines in which it has a demonstrated capacity as authorized and approved by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to sections 85-1413 and 85-1414.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 39;

Laws 1984, LB 970, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 85-955;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 26;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 93.